Connecticut, session 2026, HB05581.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Special act 22-16 is amended to read as follows (Effective
from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
Commissioner of Transportation shall convey to the town of Rocky Hill
a parcel of land located in the town of Rocky Hill, at a cost equal to [the
fair market value of the property, as determined by the average of the
appraisals of two independent appraisers selected by the commissioner,
plus] the administrative costs of making such conveyance. Said parcel
of land has an area of approximately 5.3 acres, [and] is identified as the
parcel of land located at 1090 Maple Street [,] and is further identified as
"RELEASE AREA" on a map entitled "Compilation Plan, Town of Rocky
Hill, Map Showing Land Released to ____ by the State of Connecticut
Department of Transportation, Interstate Route 291, scale 1"=40',
August 2021, Scott A. Hill, P.E., Chief Engineer-Bureau of Engineering
and Construction". The precise area of the parcel to be conveyed shall
be determined by the Department of Transportation. The conveyance
shall be subject to the approval of the State Properties Review Board.

Substitute House Bill No. 5581
(b) The town of Rocky Hill shall use said parcel of land for open space
or passive recreational purposes. If the town of Rocky Hill:
(1) Does not use said parcel for either of said purposes;
(2) Does not retain ownership of all of said parcel; or
(3) Leases all or any portion of said parcel,
the parcel shall revert to the state of Connecticut.
[(b)] (c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review
of the conveyance of said parcel of land not later than thirty days after
it receives a proposed agreement from the Department of
Transportation. The land shall remain under the care and control of said
department until a conveyance is made in accordance with the
provisions of this section. The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver
any deed or instrument necessary for a conveyance under this section,
which deed or instrument shall include provisions to carry out the
purposes of subsection (b) of this section. The Commissioner of
Transportation shall have the sole responsibility for all other incidents
of such conveyance. Any funds received by said department from a
conveyance of said parcel in accordance with this section shall be
transferred to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Special
Transportation Fund.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-22 2 of 2